dictionaries/lb/index.aff
FLAG long
SFX v3 N 146
SFX v3 n 0 [^n]n is:eifeler
SFX v3 nn 0 nn is:eifeler is:eifeler_nn
SFX v3 ënnen ann/c0 ënnen is:ip is:1ps
SFX v3 ënnen anns ënnen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v3 annen ënns annen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v3 annen ënnt annen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v3 uelen ils zuelen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v3 uelen ilt zuelen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v3 ueden iits ueden is:ip is:2ps
SFX v3 ueden it ueden is:ip is:3ps
SFX v3 sen ost osen is:ip is:2pp
SFX v3 osen éis osen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v3 osen éist osen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v3 ueren iers ueren is:ip is:2ps
SFX v3 ueren iert ueren is:ip is:3ps
SFX v3 inn äis sinn is:ip is:2ps
SFX v3 inn äit sinn is:ip is:3ps
SFX v3 nn tt [gs]inn is:ip is:2pp
SFX v3 oen éit [hd][lr]oen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v3 oen éis [hd][lr]oen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v3 oen inn/c0 [dtg]oen is:ip is:1pp
SFX v3 oen itt [dtg]oen is:ip is:2pp
SFX v3 oen ees froen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v3 oen eet froen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v3 oen ees [dgjst]oen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v3 oen eet [dgjst]oen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v3 inn ëss ginn is:ip is:2ps
SFX v3 inn ëtt ginn is:ip is:3ps
SFX v3 aen ees aen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v3 aen eet aen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v3 en t aen is:ip is:2pp
SFX v3 wen ft uewen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v3 wen fs uewen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v3 uewen iefs uewen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v3 uewen ieft uewen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v3 alen äls alen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v3 alen ält alen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v3 len alt alen is:ip is:2pp
SFX v3 uelen ëls huelen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v3 uelen ëlt huelen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v3 iessen ësst iessen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v3 iessen ëss iessen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v3 afen eefs afen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v3 afen eeft afen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v3 afen aaft afen is:ip is:2pp
SFX v3 ammen ëmms ammen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v3 ammen ëmmt ammen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v3 ommen ënns ommen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v3 ommen ënnt ommen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v3 éien iss réien is:ip is:2ps
SFX v3 en t heien is:ip is:3ps
SFX v3 eien äis eien is:ip is:2ps
SFX v3 eien äit eien is:ip is:3ps
SFX v3 en t usen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v3 en s usen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v3 aachen écht aachen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v3 aachen échs aachen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v3 den t den is:ip is:2pp
SFX v3 oden éit oden is:ip is:3ps
SFX v3 oden éits roden is:ip is:2ps
SFX v3 uffen iffs uffen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v3 uffen ifft uffen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v3 fen oft ofen is:ip is:2pp
SFX v3 ofen éifs ofen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v3 ofen éift ofen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v3 angen éngt angen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v3 angen éngs angen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v3 iechen écht iechen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v3 iechen échs iechen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v3 effen ëffs effen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v3 effen ëfft effen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v3 ieden ëts ieden is:ip is:2ps
SFX v3 ieden ëtt ieden is:ip is:3ps
SFX v3 erfen ërfs erfen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v3 erfen ërft erfen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v3 aufen ëfs aufen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v3 aufen ëft aufen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v3 aufen äifs aufen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v3 aufen äift aufen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v3 uessen iiss uessen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v3 uessen iisst uessen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v3 éien itt éien is:ip is:3ps
SFX v3 éien itts [lz]éien is:ip is:2ps
SFX v3 otmen tems otmen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v3 otmen temt otmen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v3 nen ent [^n]nen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v3 nen ens [^n]nen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v3 aken écks aken is:ip is:2ps
SFX v3 aken éckt aken is:ip is:3ps
SFX v3 en s heien is:ip is:2ps
SFX v3 ëssen eess ëssen is:ip is:1ps
SFX v3 ëssen eess ëssen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v3 ëssen eess ëssen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v3 en 0 [ëo]llen is:ip is:1ps
SFX v3 en s [ëo]llen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v3 en 0 [ëo]llen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v3 en t ëllen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v3 0 0 [^o][en]n is:ip is:1pp
SFX v3 0 0 [^o][en]n is:ip is:3pp
SFX v3 aken éckt aken is:ip is:2pp
SFX v3 wen ft uewen is:ip is:2pp
SFX v3 ënnen ann ënnen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v3 en s joen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v3 nen ent [^n]nen is:ip is:2pp
SFX v3 otmen temt otmen is:ip is:2pp
SFX v3 éien itt éien is:ip is:2pp
SFX v3 0 0 [^gt]oen is:ip is:1pp
SFX v3 0 0 [^gt]oen is:ip is:3pp
SFX v3 oen inn/c0 [dtg]oen is:ip is:3pp
SFX v3 en t [^adéfghot][afghilmnors]en is:ip is:2pp
SFX v3 ken aks ken is:ip is:2ps
SFX v3 ken akt ken is:ip is:3ps
SFX v3 ken akt ken is:ip is:2pp
SFX v3 en s erfen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v3 en t erfen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v3 en 0 ten is:ip is:2pp
SFX v3 apten aps apten is:ip is:2ps
SFX v3 en s ten is:ip is:2ps
SFX v3 en 0 ten is:ip is:3ps
SFX v3 0 0 [^hlnos][en]n is:ip is:1ps
SFX v3 0 0 [^cglnst][hlnos]en is:ip is:1ps
SFX v3 0 0 [^ë]ssen is:ip is:1ps
SFX v3 0 0 [ls]oen is:ip is:1ps
SFX v3 0 0 [ae]chen is:ip is:1ps
SFX v3 0 0 annen is:ip is:1ps
SFX v3 oen inn/c0 [dgt]oen is:ip is:1ps
SFX v3 en 0 uchen is:ip is:1ps
SFX v3 en s iewen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v3 en t [il][eo]wen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v3 en t [il][eo]wen is:ip is:2pp
SFX v3 n 0 [^o]en is:ip is:3pp is:eifeler
SFX v3 nn 0 nn is:ip is:3pp is:eifeler is:eifeler_nn
SFX v3 n 0 [^gt]oen is:ip is:3pp is:eifeler
SFX v3 n 0 [^o]en is:ip is:1pp is:eifeler
SFX v3 nn 0 nn is:ip is:1pp is:eifeler is:eifeler_nn
SFX v3 n 0 [^gt]oen is:ip is:1pp is:eifeler
SFX v3 n 0 [^hlnos]en is:ip is:1ps is:eifeler
SFX v3 nn 0 nn is:ip is:1ps is:eifeler is:eifeler_nn
SFX v3 n 0 [^cglnst][hlnos]en is:ip is:1ps is:eifeler
SFX v3 n 0 [^ë]ssen is:ip is:1ps is:eifeler
SFX v3 n 0 [ls]oen is:ip is:1ps is:eifeler
SFX v3 n 0 [ae]chen is:ip is:1ps is:eifeler
SFX v3 n 0 annen is:ip is:1ps is:eifeler
SFX v3 en t doen is:ip is:2pp
SFX v3 en t ffen is:ip is:2pp
SFX v3 en s uchen is:ip is:2ps

SFX v0 N 34
SFX v0 en s [^djrswxz]en is:ip is:2ps
SFX v0 en t [^djrtw]en is:ip is:3ps
SFX v0 den ts [^d]den is:ip is:2ps
SFX v0 den t [^d]den is:ip is:3ps
SFX v0 dden tts dden is:ip is:2ps
SFX v0 dden tt dden is:ip is:3ps
SFX v0 en s [^äio]ren is:ip is:2ps
SFX v0 en t [^äio]ren is:ip is:3ps
SFX v0 ren ers [äio]ren is:ip is:2ps
SFX v0 ren ert [äio]ren is:ip is:3ps
SFX v0 ën s ën is:ip is:2ps
SFX v0 ën t ën is:ip is:3ps
SFX v0 jen chs jen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v0 jen cht jen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v0 wen fs wen is:ip is:2ps
SFX v0 wen ft wen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v0 en 0 [sxz]en is:ip is:2ps
SFX v0 0 0 . is:ip is:1ps
SFX v0 0 0 . is:ip is:1pp
SFX v0 0 0 . is:ip is:3pp
SFX v0 en t [^djrtw]en is:ip is:2pp
SFX v0 den t [^d]den is:ip is:2pp
SFX v0 dden tt dden is:ip is:2pp
SFX v0 en t [^äio]ren is:ip is:2pp
SFX v0 ren ert [äio]ren is:ip is:2pp
SFX v0 ën t ën is:ip is:2pp
SFX v0 jen cht jen is:ip is:2pp
SFX v0 wen ft wen is:ip is:2pp
SFX v0 en 0 ten is:ip is:3ps
SFX v0 en 0 ten is:ip is:3pp
SFX v0 n 0 . is:ip is:1ps is:eifeler
SFX v0 n 0 . is:ip is:1pp is:eifeler
SFX v0 n 0 . is:ip is:3pp is:eifeler
SFX v0 n 0 . is:eifeler

SFX w2 N 18
SFX w2 nen en/c0 nen is:impe is:sg
SFX w2 otmen tem otmen is:impe is:sg
SFX w2 oen éi oen is:impe is:sg
SFX w2 inn ëff ginn is:impe is:sg
SFX w2 unn ief unn is:impe is:sg
SFX w2 inn éi sinn is:impe is:sg
SFX w2 apten p apten is:impe is:sg
SFX w2 oen itt oen is:impe is:pl
SFX w2 nn tt nn is:impe is:pl
SFX w2 otmen temt otmen is:impe is:pl
SFX w2 nen ent nen is:impe is:pl
SFX w2 unn ieft unn is:impe is:pl
SFX w2 en 0 ten is:impe is:pl
SFX w2 en 0 ten is:impe is:sg
SFX w2 éien itt éien is:impe is:pl
SFX w2 en 0 éien is:impe is:sg
SFX w2 en 0 wen is:impe is:sg
SFX w2 en t wen is:impe is:pl
